Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon  Youth Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Facility programs......................  $ 185,176,739
(2) Community programs ...............  $ 80,992,209
(3) Program support.......................  $ 57,678,412
(4) Juvenile crime
prevention/diversion..................  $ 20,038,997
(5) Multnomah County gang
prevention services ................... $ 3,846,589
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 15,206,863
(7) Capital improvements ............... $ 1,662,707
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for the following purposes:
(1) Facility programs...................... $ 4,793,800
(2) Community programs ............... $ 2,362,828
(3) Program support ....................... $ 82,864
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Youth  Authority, for the
following purposes:
(1) Community programs ............... $ 34,932,231
(2) Program support ....................... $ 1,986,446
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 2